Washington statutes.
RCW 22.09.870

Injunctions.

The director may bring an action in the name of the state to temporarily and/or permanently enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted pursuant to this chapter in the superior court in the county in which such violation occurs notwithstanding the existence of any other remedy at law.

[ 1963 c 124 s 54. Formerly RCW 22.09.540.]